Utah statutes.
4-31-19.   Fee to compensate state for quarantine and sanitary procedures.

To compensate the state for the expense of carrying out quarantine and sanitary procedures, the commissioner may collect a fee, determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), on cattle, horses, and sheep that enter the state from a quarantined or infected area.

